Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 342.22 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Volunteer Firefighter Support Program".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 342.23 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created a grant program to support the
training needs of volunteer firefighters in Oklahoma. The program
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2759 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l assist volunteer firefighters in receiving up to ten (10)
hours in training a year from programs approved by the State Fire
Marshal or by the Forestry Division of the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.
B. The State Fire Marshal shall create an application system
for volunteer firefighters to apply for the grant assistance. The
State Fire Marshal may promulgate rules for the grant program.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 342.24 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Fire Marshal to be designated the "Oklahoma Volunteer
Firefighter Support Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the State Fire Marshal from appropriations,
donations, grants, or other sources of funding specifically
designated for deposit to the Oklahoma Volunteer Firefighter Support
Revolving Fund. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Fire Marshal for the purpose of this act. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2759 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2759 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)